Utah statutes.
34A-2-503.   Loss of hearing -- Occupational hearing loss due to noise to be compensated.

(1)  Permanent hearing loss caused by exposure to harmful industrial noise or by direct head injury shall be compensated according to the terms and conditions of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.

(2) A claim for compensation for hearing loss for harmful industrial noise may not be paid under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, unless it can be demonstrated by a professionally controlled sound test that the employee has been exposed to harmful industrial noise as defined in Section 34A-2-501 while employed by the employer against whom the claim is made.

